Hawaii statutes.
[§78‑3.1] Whistleblowers;
notice. (a) Upon receipt of any complaint made pursuant to section 378-70,
the department of labor and industrial relations shall inform the complainant
of the complainant's rights under the law.

(b) The department of labor and industrial
relations shall prescribe the content and the posting of notices pertaining to
the application of sections 378-70 and 396-8(e). [L 2011, c 166, §2]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next